Hawaii statutes.
§346-7.5 Spouse and child abuse special
account; department of human services. (a) There is established within
the state treasury a special fund to be known as the "spouse and child
abuse special account", and to be administered and expended by the department
of human services.

(b) The proceeds of the account shall be
reserved for use by the department of human services for staff programs, and
grants or purchases of service, consistent with chapters 42F and 103F, that
support or provide spouse or child abuse intervention or prevention as
authorized by law. These proceeds shall be used for new or existing programs
and shall not supplant any other funds previously allocated to these programs.
The account shall be kept separate and apart from all other funds in the
treasury.

(c) The account shall consist of fees remitted
pursuant to sections 338-14.5 and 572-5, income tax remittances allocated under
section 235-102.5, interest and investment earnings, grants, donations, and
contributions from private or public sources. All realizations of the account
shall be subject to the conditions specified in subsection (b).

(d) The department of human services, in
coordination with the department of health, shall submit an annual report to
the legislature, prior to the convening of each regular session, providing an
accounting of the receipts of and expenditures from the account. [L 1994, c
232, §2; am L 1997, c 190, §6; am L 2004, c 228, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next